Washington statutes.
RCW 18.53.180

Discrimination prohibited—Agreements or contracts by state and subdivisions.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the state and its political subdivisions, and all officials, agents, employees, or representatives thereof, are prohibited from entering into any agreement or contract with any individual, group, association, or corporation which in any way, directly or indirectly, discriminates against licensed optometrists in performing and receiving compensation for services covered by their licenses.

[ 1973 c 48 s 4.]